District of Columbia statutes.
29-808.02

Derivative action.

A member may maintain a derivative action in the Superior Court to enforce a right of a limited liability company if:

(1)

The member first makes a demand on the other members in a member-managed limited liability company, or the managers of a manager-managed limited liability company, requesting that they cause the company to bring an action to enforce the right, and the managers or other members do not bring the action within a reasonable time; or

(2)

A demand under paragraph (1) of this section would be futile.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 902 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).
This section is referenced in § 29-808.04 and § 29-808.06.